Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Alaska.

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions describing the relationship between pending hearings and other proceedings, orders and regulations adopted and in effect, contracts, rights, liabilities, and obligations, and records, equipment, appropriations, funds and other property of boards and agencies affected by the 2005 amendment of this chapter, and the provisions of ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, relating to administration of the public employees’ retirement system, see § 139, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 39.35.001.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage qualified personnel to enter and remain in service with participating employers by establishing plans for the payment of retirement, disability, and death benefits to or on behalf of the members.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Stated

in

State v. Retired Pub. Emples. of Alaska, Inc., 502 P.3d 422 (Alaska 2022).

Sec. 39.35.002.
Attorney general.

The attorney general of the state is the legal counsel for the system and shall advise the administrator and represent the system in a legal proceeding.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.003.
Administrator.

The commissioner of administration or the commissioner’s designee is the administrator of the system.

The commissioner of administration shall adopt regulations to govern the operation of the system.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

For service under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 4.

For employment-related benefits for same-sex partners of state employees and retirees under the state’s retirement systems, see 2 AAC 38.

Sec. 39.35.004.
Powers and duties of the administrator.

The administrator shall

establish and maintain an adequate system of accounts;

transmit the funds deposited in the system to the retirement fund established and maintained by the Alaska Retirement Management Board;

approve or disapprove claims for retirement benefits;

make payments for the various purposes specified;

submit periodic reports or statements of account that are needed;

issue a statement of account to an employee not less than once each year showing the amount of the employee’s contributions to the applicable plan in the system;

formulate and recommend to the commissioner of administration regulations to govern the operation of the system;

as soon as possible after the close of each fiscal year, and not later than six months after the close of each fiscal year, send to the governor and the legislature an annual statement on the operations of each of the plans in the system containing

a balance sheet;

a statement of income and expenditures for the year;

a report on valuation of trust fund assets;

a summary of assets held in the trust fund listed by the categories of investment, as provided by the Alaska Retirement Management Board;

other statistical financial data that are necessary for proper understanding of the financial condition of the system as a whole and each plan in the system and the result of its operations;

engage an independent certified public accountant to conduct an annual audit of each plan’s accounts and the annual report of the system’s financial condition and activity;

report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee concerning the condition and administration of each plan and distribute the report to the members of each plan in the system;

publish an information handbook for each plan in the system at intervals that the administrator considers appropriate;

meet at least annually with the board to review the condition and management of the retirement systems and to review significant changes to policies, regulations or benefits; and

do whatever else may be necessary to carry out the purposes of each plan in the system.

The administrator is authorized to charge uniform fees to members’ accounts to cover the ongoing cost of operating each plan in the system.

The administrator is authorized to contract with public and private entities to provide record keeping, benefits payments, and other functions necessary for the administration of each plan in the system.

The administrator is authorized to determine the rate of interest assessed under AS

39.35.610(c)

.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, added (d).

Sec. 39.35.005.
Regulations.

Regulations adopted by the commissioner of administration under this chapter relate to the internal management of state agencies, and the adoption of these regulations is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a regulation adopted under this chapter shall be published in the Alaska Administrative Register and Code for informational purposes.

Each regulation adopted under this chapter must conform to the style and format requirements of the drafting manual for administrative regulations that is published under AS

44.62.050

.

At least 30 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under this chapter, the commissioner shall provide notice of the action that is being considered. The notice shall be

posted in public buildings throughout the state;

published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each judicial district of the state;

mailed to each person or group that has filed a request for notice of proposed action with the commissioner; and

furnished to each member of the legislature and to the Legislative Affairs Agency.

Failure to mail notice to a person as required under (d)(3) of this section does not invalidate an action taken by the commissioner.

The commissioner may hold a public hearing on a proposed regulation.

A regulation adopted under this chapter takes effect 30 days after adoption by the commissioner.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, a regulation may be adopted, amended, or repealed, effective immediately, as an emergency regulation by the commissioner. For an emergency regulation to be effective, the commissioner must find that the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation is necessary for the immediate preservation of the orderly operation of the system. The commissioner shall, within 10 days after adoption of an emergency regulation, give notice of the adoption under (d) of this section.

In this section, “regulation” has the meaning given in AS

44.62.640(a)

.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

For employment-related benefits for same-sex partners of state employees and retirees under the state’s retirement systems, see 2 AAC 38.

Sec. 39.35.006.
Appeals.

An employer, member, annuitant, or beneficiary may appeal a decision made by the administrator to the office of administrative hearings established under AS 44.64. An aggrieved party may appeal a final decision to the superior court.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.007.
Investment management of retirement system funds.

The Alaska Retirement Management Board established under AS

37.10.210

is the fiduciary of the system funds.

History.

(§ 81 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.008.
Definitions.

In AS

39.35.001

—

39.35.008

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of administration;

“plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

or the retirement plan established in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

;

“system” means all retirement plans established under the public employees’ retirement system.

History.

(§§ 81, 82 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.010.
Purpose and effective date; federal qualification requirements. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 39.35.011.
Exclusive benefit.

The corpus or income of the assets held in trust as required by the plan may not be diverted to or used for other than the exclusive benefit of the members or their beneficiaries.

History.

(§ 28 ch 59 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Secs. 39.35.020 — 39.35.047.
Administration; Public Employees Retirement Board; Powers and duties of board; Regulations; Hearings. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 39.35.050.
Administrator. [Repealed, § 50 ch 13 SLA 1980 and § 116(a) ch 20 SLA 2007.]

Sec. 39.35.060.
Duties of the administrator. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]

Sec. 39.35.070.
Duty of employers to furnish records.

Each employer shall furnish the administrator with records concerning the periods of service, dates of birth, compensation, new entrants into service, death, withdrawals, and other employee data necessary for the proper and effective operation of the system.

History.

(§ 33 b ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 1 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Secs. 39.35.080, 39.35.090.
Duties of the Alaska State Pension Investment Board; Attorney general. [Repealed, § 132 ch 9 FSSLA 2005.]